Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.040

May demand fees in advance.

No sheriff, deputy sheriff, or coroner shall be liable for any damages for neglecting or refusing to serve any civil process unless his or her legal fees are first tendered him or her.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4053; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.040. Prior: 1941 c 237 s 1, part; 1935 c 33 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2772, part; 1863 p 558 s 7, part; 1854 p 434 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4172, part.]